Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-240
Board; review foreign licensing requirements.

The Board of Barber Examiners shall at least once each year review the licensing requirements of other states or countries which issue licenses to practice barbering in the various classifications in which the board conducts examinations for licenses in this state. The board shall examine such requirements and, after making such other inquiries as it deems necessary, shall certify the states and countries having substantially equivalent requirements to those existing in this state for the practice of barbering and with which such board desires to enter into a reciprocal licensure agreement.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 3.